Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 4. Capital Construction Projects
§ 21-17-422.
Use of surplus proceeds.

Any unexpended balance of the proceeds of securities remaining after the completion of the acquisition or improvement of properties pertaining to the project or otherwise the completion of the purpose or purposes for which the securities were issued shall be credited immediately to the fund or account created for the payment of the interest on or the principal of the securities, or both principal and interest, and shall be used therefor, subject to the provisions as to the times and methods for their payment as stated in the securities and the proceedings authorizing or otherwise appertaining to their issuance, or so paid into a reserve therefor, or any combination thereof, as the board may determine.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 21; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.70; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-422.

§ 21-17-423.
Securities not affected by validity of project; purchaser not responsible as to application of proceeds.

The validity of any securities shall not be dependent on nor affected by the validity or regularity of any proceedings relating to a project or the proper completion of any purpose for which the securities are issued.

The purchaser or purchasers of the securities are not responsible for the application of the proceeds of the securities by the board or any officers, agents and employees of the board or the university, or of both.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 22; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.71; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-423.

§ 21-17-424.
Creation of special funds and accounts.

The board in any resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds or other securities under this act or in any instrument or other proceedings appertaining thereto may create special funds and accounts for the payment of the cost of a project, of operation and maintenance expenses, of the securities, including the accumulation and maintenance of reserves therefor, of improvements, including the accumulation and maintenance of reserves therefor, and of other obligations appertaining to the securities, any project or otherwise in connection with the university.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 23; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.72; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-424.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-17-404(a)(xxviii).

§ 21-17-425.
Authority of board to employ experts, enter into contracts for services regarding securities.

The board may employ legal, fiscal, engineering, and other expert services in connection with any project or otherwise appertaining to the university and the authorization, sale and issuance of bonds and other securities under this act.

The board is authorized to enter into any contracts or arrangements not inconsistent with this act with respect to the sale of bonds or other securities hereunder, the employment of bond counsel, and other matters as the board may determine to be necessary or desirable in accomplishing the purposes of this act.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 24; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.73; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-425.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-17-404(a)(xxviii).

§ 21-17-426.
Investment of pledged revenues.

The board may cause to be invested and reinvested any pledged revenues and any proceeds of bonds or other securities issued hereunder in any investments authorized under W.S.

9-4-831

and may cause the revenues, proceeds of securities and investments to be deposited, subject to any limitations appertaining thereto in section 7, article 15, Wyoming Constitution, in any trust bank or banks and secured in such manner and subject to such terms and conditions as the board may determine, with or without the payment of any interest on the deposit, including without limitation time deposits evidenced by certificates of deposit.

Any investments under subsection (a) of this section may be sold and the proceeds reinvested or redeposited as provided in this section.

Sales and redemptions of any investments under subsection (a) of this section shall be made in season so that the proceeds may be applied to the purposes for which the money with which the investments were originally acquired was placed in the treasury of the board.

Any gain from any investments or reinvestments under this section may be credited to any fund or account pledged for the payment of any securities issued under this act, including any reserve therefor, or any other fund or account appertaining to a project or otherwise appertaining to the university.

Any commercial bank incorporated under the laws of this state which may act as depository of the proceeds of any securities issued hereunder, any investments under subsection (a) of this section owned by the board, any pledged revenues, and any monies otherwise appertaining to the university may furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such investments or such other securities as may be required by the board.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 25; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.74; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-426; Laws 2005, ch. 143, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “any investments authorized under W.S.

9-4-831

,” “investments” and “investments under subsection (a) of this section” for references to “federal securities” and to “federal securities and certificates of deposit.” throughout.

§ 21-17-427.
Covenants in resolution limiting powers to secure payment.

Any resolution providing for the issuance of any bonds or other securities under this act payable from pledged revenues and any indenture or other instrument or proceedings appertaining thereto may contain covenants or other provisions which may limit the exercise of powers conferred under this act, in order to secure the payment of the securities in agreement with the holders of the securities, including without limitation covenants or other provisions as to any of the following:

The pledged revenues to be fixed, charged or levied and the collection, use and disposition thereof, including but not limited to the foreclosure of liens for delinquents, the discontinuance of services, facilities or use of any properties or facilities, prohibition against free service, the collection of penalties and collection costs, and the use and disposition of any monies of the board, derived or to be derived, from any source herein designated;

The acquisition, improvement or equipment of all or any part of properties pertaining to any project or any facilities;

The creation and maintenance of reserves or sinking funds to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any securities or of operation and maintenance expenses of any facilities, or part thereof, and the source, custody, security, regulation, use and disposition of any reserves or funds, including but not limited to the powers and duties of any trustee with regard thereto;

A fair and reasonable payment by the board from available monies to the account of any designated facilities for services rendered thereby to the board or university;

The payment of the cost of any project by delineating the purpose or purposes to which the proceeds of the sale of securities may be applied, and the custody, security, use, expenditure, application and disposition thereof;

The application of any accrued interest and any premium from the sale of any bonds or other securities hereunder to the cost of a project, to any bond fund or other fund or account for the payment of interest on or the principal of the bonds or other securities, or both interest and principal, or to any reserve fund or account therefor, or any combination thereof;

The registration of the bonds or other securities for payment as to principal and interest;

The endorsement of payments of interest on the bonds or other securities;

The endorsement of payments of principal on the bonds or other securities;

The initial issuance of one (1) or more bonds or other securities in book-entry form aggregating the amount of the entire issue or any portion thereof, and the endorsement of payments of interest or principal, or both interest and principal, on the securities;

The manner and circumstances in and under which any such bond or other securities may in the future, at the request of the holder thereof, be converted into bonds or other securities of smaller denominations;

The reissuance of any outstanding bond or other securities, and the terms and conditions thereof, whether lost, apparently destroyed, wrongfully taken, or for any other reason, as provided in the Uniform Commercial Code, W.S. 34.1-8-101 through 34.1-8-603, or otherwise;

The temporary investment and any reinvestment of proceeds of bonds or other securities or pledged revenues in investments under W.S.

21-17-426

;

The deposit of monies or investments under W.S.

21-17-426

with and securing their repayment by a commercial bank or banks;

The pledge of and the creation of a lien upon pledged revenues or the proceeds of bonds or other securities pending their application to defray the cost of any project, or both such revenues and proceeds of securities, to secure the payment of bonds or other securities, issued under this act;

The payment of the principal of and interest on any securities, and the sources and methods thereof, the rank or priority of any securities as to any lien or security for payment, or the acceleration of any maturity of any securities, or the issuance of other or additional securities payable from or constituting a charge against or lien upon any pledged revenues or other monies pledged for the payment of securities and the creation of future liens and encumbrances there against;

The use, regulation, inspection, management, operation, maintenance or disposition, or any limitation or regulation of the use, of all or any part of the facilities or any property of the board or university and the making and enforcement of reasonable parietal rules that shall insure the use of the facilities by all students in attendance at the university who reside on the campus of the university, or otherwise, to the maximum extent to which the facilities are capable of serving the students;

The determination or definition of pledged revenues from any facilities or of operation and maintenance expenses of facilities, the use and disposition of the revenues and the manner of and limitations upon paying expenses;

The creation of special funds and accounts appertaining to any pledged revenues or to the bonds or other securities issued under this act;

The insurance to be carried by the board or any other person in interest and use and disposition of insurance monies, the acquisition of completion, performance, surety and fidelity bonds appertaining to any project or funds, or both, and the use and disposition of any proceeds of the bonds;

Books of account, the inspection and audit thereof, and other records appertaining to any project, facilities or pledged revenues;

The assumption or payment or discharge of any obligation, lien or other claim relating to any part of any project, any facilities, or any securities having or which may have a lien on any part of any pledged revenues or other monies of the board or university;

Limitations on the powers of the board to acquire or operate, or permit the acquisition or operation of, any structures, facilities or properties which may compete or tend to compete with any facilities;

The vesting in a corporate or other trustee or trustees such property, rights, powers and duties in trust as the board may determine which may include any or all of the rights, powers and duties of the trustee appointed by the holders of securities, and limiting or abrogating the right of the holders to appoint a trustee, or limiting the rights, duties and powers of the trustee;

The payment of costs or expenses incident to the enforcement of the securities or of the provisions of the resolution or of any covenant or contract with the holders of the securities;

Events of default, rights and liabilities arising therefrom, and the rights, liabilities, powers and duties arising upon the breach by the board of any covenants, conditions or obligations;

The terms and conditions upon which the holders of the securities or any portion, percentage or amount of them may enforce any covenants or provisions made under this act or duties imposed thereby;

The terms and conditions upon which the holders of the securities or of a specified portion, percentage or amount thereof, or any trustee therefor, are entitled to the appointment of a receiver, which receiver may enter and take possession of any facilities or service, operate and maintain the same, prescribe fees, rates and charges, and collect, receive and apply all revenues thereafter arising therefrom in the same manner as the board itself might do;

A procedure by which the terms of any resolution authorizing securities, or any other contract with any holders of securities, including but not limited to an indenture of trust or similar instrument, may be amended or abrogated, and as to the amount of securities the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which consent may be given;

The terms and conditions upon which any or all of the securities shall become or may be declared due before maturity and as to the terms and conditions upon which the declaration and its consequences may be waived; and

All acts and things as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to secure the securities, or in the discretion of the board tend to make the securities more marketable, notwithstanding that the covenant, act or thing may not be enumerated in this section, it being the intention hereof to give the board power to do all things in the issuance of the board’s securities and for their security except as expressly limited by this act.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 26; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.75; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-427; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2005, ch. 143, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(xii), substituted “34.1-8-603” for “34.1-8-406.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote (a)(vii), (a)(viii), (a)(ix), and (a)(xi), removing restrictions on the issuance, refunding, reconverting and payment of bonds; in (a)(x), inserted “in book-entry form”; and substituted “investments under W.S.

21-17-426

” for “federal securities” in (a)(xiii) and (a)(xiv).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-17-404(a)(xxviii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 21-17-428.
Lien against pledged revenue.

Revenues pledged for the payment of any securities, as received by or otherwise credited to the board, are immediately subject to the lien of each pledge without any physical delivery thereof, any filing, or further act.

The lien of each pledge and the obligation to perform the contractual provisions made in the authorizing resolution or other instrument appertaining thereto is prior to any other obligations and liabilities of the board except as may be otherwise provided in this act or in the resolution or other instrument, and subject to any prior pledges and liens theretofore created.

The lien of each pledge is valid and binding as against all persons having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the board or university irrespective of whether the persons have notice thereof.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 27; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.76; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-428.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-17-404(a)(xxviii).

§ 21-17-429.
Rights and powers of securities holders.

Subject to any contractual limitations binding upon the holders of any issue or series of securities, or trustee therefor, including but not limited to the restriction of the exercise of any remedy to a specified proportion, percentage or number of holders, and subject to any prior or superior rights of others, any holder of securities, or trustee therefor, shall have the right and power, for the equal benefit and protection of all holders of securities similarly situated:

By mandamus or other suit, action or proceeding at law or in equity to enforce his rights against and to require or compel the board or university, or both, the president of the university, and any other of the officers, agents and employees of the board or university, or both, to perform and carry out their respective duties, obligations or other commitments under this act and their respective covenants and agreements with the holder of any security;

By action or suit in equity to require the board or university, or both, to account as if they were the trustee of an express trust;

By action or suit in equity to have appointed a receiver who may enter and take possession of any facilities and any pledged revenues for the payment of the securities, prescribe sufficient fees derived from the facilities, and collect, receive and apply all pledged revenues or other monies pledged for the payment of the securities in the same manner as the board itself might do in accordance with the obligations of the board; and

By action or suit in equity to enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful or in violation of the rights of the holder of any securities and to bring suit thereupon.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 28; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.77; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-429.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 21-17-430.
Receivership.

If a resolution of the board authorizing or providing for the issuance of any securities of any series or any other proceedings appertaining thereto contains a provision authorized by W.S. 21-17-427(a)(xxviii) and provides in substance that any trustee appointed pursuant to the subsection has the powers provided by that subsection, then the trustee, whether or not all of the bonds or other securities of series have been declared due and payable, is entitled as of right to the appointment of a receiver of the facilities appertaining thereto.

Any receiver appointed as permitted by W.S. 21-17-427(a)(xxviii) may enter upon and take possession of the facilities and property appertaining thereto, and, subject to any pledge or contract with the holders of the securities, shall take possession of all monies and other property derived from or applicable to the acquisition, operation, maintenance or improvement of the facilities and proceed with the acquisition, operation, maintenance or improvement which the board is under any obligation to do, and operate, maintain, equip and improve the facilities, and, fix, charge, collect, enforce and receive the service charges and all revenues thereafter arising subject to any pledge thereof or contract with the holders of the securities relating thereto and perform the public duties and carry out the contracts and obligations of the board in the same manner as the board itself might do and under the direction of the court.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 29; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.78; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-430.

§ 21-17-431.
Rights of holder cumulative and nonexclusive.

No right or remedy conferred upon any holder of any securities or any trustee for the holder or by any proceedings appertaining to the issuance of the securities is exclusive of any right or remedy but each right or remedy is cumulative and in addition to every other right or remedy and may be exercised without exhausting and without regard to any other remedy.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 30; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.79; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-431; Laws 2005, ch. 143, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, twice deleted references to coupons.

§ 21-17-432.
Omission by security holder not to relieve board or university of obligation.

The failure of any holder of any securities to proceed as provided by this act shall not relieve the board or the university, or any of their officers, agents and employees of any liability for failure to perform or carry out any duty, obligation or other commitment.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 31; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.80; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-432; Laws 2005, ch. 143, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “securities” for “securities or any coupons appertaining thereto.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-17-404(a)(xxviii).

§ 21-17-433.
Interim debentures; maturity; use of proceeds; funding of notes or warrants with proceeds.

Any interim debentures may mature at such time or times not exceeding a period of time equal to the estimated time needed to effect the purpose or purposes for which they are issued or for which the bonds are authorized to be issued, but not exceeding three (3) years from the date of the interim debentures, as the board may determine.

The proceeds of interim debentures shall be used to defray the cost of the project appertaining thereto.

Any notes or warrants may be funded with the proceeds of interim debentures as well as with the proceeds of bonds.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 32; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.81; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-433.

§ 21-17-434.
Interim debentures; pledges for security.

Pledged revenues and other monies, including without limitation proceeds of bonds to be issued or reissued after the issuance of interim debentures, and bonds issued for the purpose of securing the payment of interim debentures, may be pledged for the purpose of securing the payment of interim debentures.

Any bonds pledged as collateral security for the payment of any interim debentures shall mature at such time or times as the board may determine, but in no event exceeding fifty (50) years from the dates of the bonds and interim debentures, or if the dates are not the same, from whichever date is the earlier.

Any bonds pledged as collateral security shall not be issued in an aggregate principal amount exceeding the aggregate principal amount of the interim debenture or interim debentures secured by a pledge of the bonds.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 33; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.82; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 46; 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-434; Laws 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1.

§ 21-17-435.
Interim debentures; limit as to extension or funding.

No interim debentures issued pursuant to the provisions hereof shall be extended or funded except by the issuance or reissuance of a bond or bonds in compliance herewith.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 34; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.83; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-435.

§ 21-17-436.
Interim debentures; bonds for funding.

For the purpose of funding any interim debentures, any bonds pledged as collateral security to secure the payment of interim debentures, upon their surrender as pledged property, may be reissued, and any bonds not previously issued but authorized to be issued by any law for a purpose or purposes the same as or encompassing the purpose or purposes for which the interim debentures were issued, may be issued for such a funding.

Any bonds shall mature at such time or times as the board may determine, but in no event exceeding fifty (50) years from the dates of the interim debentures so funded and the bonds so pledged as collateral security, or if the dates are not the same, from whichever date is the earlier.

Bonds for funding and bonds for any other purpose or purposes may be issued separately or issued in combination in one (1) or more series.

Except as herein otherwise provided in W.S.

21-17-433

through

21-17-436

, any funding bonds shall be issued as is provided by this act for other bonds.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 35; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.84; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-436.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-17-404(a)(xxviii).

§ 21-17-437.
Refunding and refunding bonds; authority to refund bonds; limitation on refunding; exchange or surrender of bonds held by state for purposes of refunding.

Any bonds of the board or university payable from any pledged revenues may be refunded by the adoption of a resolution or resolutions by the board and by any trust indenture or other proceedings appertaining thereto, authorizing the issuance of bonds:

To refund, pay, and discharge all or any part of the outstanding bonds of any one (1) or more or all outstanding issues, including any interest thereon in arrears, or about to become due for any period not exceeding three (3) years from the date of the refunding bonds;

For the purpose of reducing interest costs or effecting other economies;

For the purpose of modifying or eliminating restrictive contractual limitations appertaining to the issuance of additional bonds, otherwise concerning the outstanding bonds, or to any facilities appertaining thereto; or

For any combination thereof.

The board may not call bonds now or hereafter outstanding for prior redemption in order to refund the bonds or in order to pay them prior to their stated maturities, unless the right to call the bonds for prior redemption was specifically reserved and stated in the bonds at the time of their issuance, and all conditions with respect to the manner, price and time applicable to the prior redemption as set forth in the proceedings authorizing the outstanding bonds are strictly observed. No holder of an outstanding bond may be compelled to surrender the bond for refunding prior to its stated maturity or optional date of prior redemption expressly reserved therein even though the refunding might result in financial benefit to the board or university.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this section or of any other law, this state, acting by and through the governor with the approval of the state treasurer and the attorney general, may agree with the board to exchange any outstanding bonds of the board and held by the state, or any agency, corporation, department or other instrumentality of the state, for refunding bonds of the board, or otherwise to surrender the outstanding bonds to the board for refunding at such price and time and otherwise upon such conditions and other terms and in such manner as may be mutually agreeable at any time prior to their respective maturities or to any date as of which the board has the right and option to call the outstanding bonds for prior redemption as expressly provided in the outstanding bonds and any resolution, trust indenture or other proceedings authorizing their issuance.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 36; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.85; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 41-2-437.

§ 21-17-438.
Refunding and refunding bonds; exchange generally; sale; exchange for escrow investment.

Any bonds issued for refunding purposes may either be delivered in exchange for the outstanding bonds being refunded or may be publicly or privately sold.

The refunding bonds, or any part thereof, may be exchanged by the board for investments under W.S.

21-17-426

which have been made available for escrow investment by any purchaser of refunding bonds, upon terms of exchange mutually agreed upon, and any such investments so received by the board shall be placed in escrow as provided by W.S.

21-17-440

and

21-17-441

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 37; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.86; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-438; Laws 2005, ch. 143, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (b), substituted “investments under W.S.

21-17-426

” and a variant for “federal securities.”

§ 21-17-439.
Refunding and refunding bonds; conditions under which bonds may be refunded.

No bonds may be refunded hereunder unless they have been outstanding for at least one (1) year from the date of their delivery and unless the holders thereof voluntarily surrender them for exchange or payment.

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 143, § 2.

The principal amount of the refunding bonds may exceed the principal amount of the refunded bonds if the aggregate principal and interest costs of the refunding bonds do not exceed the unaccrued costs of the bonds refunded, except to the extent any interest on the bonds refunded in arrears or about to become due is capitalized with the proceeds of the refunding bonds. Principal may also then be increased to that extent.

The principal amount of the refunding bonds may also be less than or the same as the principal amount of the bonds being refunded so long as provision is duly and sufficiently made for their payment.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 38; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.87; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 47; 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-439; Laws 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1; 2005, ch. 143, §§ 1, 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), deleted “or unless they either mature or are callable for prior redemption under their terms within fifteen (15) years from the date of issuance of the refunding bonds. Provision shall be made for paying the securities within stated period of time”; and repealed former (b), which proscribed the maturing of a refunded bond extended over 15 years or beyond one year following the date of the last outstanding maturity, whichever was later.

§ 21-17-440.
Refunding and refunding bonds; disposition of proceeds; payment of costs; application of accrued interest and premiums.

Except as otherwise provided, the proceeds of refunding bonds shall either be immediately applied to the retirement of the bonds to be refunded or be placed in escrow or trust in any trust bank or trust banks to be applied to the payment of the refunded bonds or the refunding bonds, or both, upon their presentation therefor to the extent, in such priority and otherwise in the manner which the board may determine.

The incidental costs of the refunding of bonds may be paid by the purchaser of the refunding bonds or be defrayed from other available revenues of the board or from the proceeds of the refunding bonds, or from the interest or other yield derived from the investment of any refunding bond proceeds or other monies in escrow or trust, or from any other sources legally available therefor, or any combination thereof, as the board may determine.

Any accrued interest and any premium appertaining to a sale of refunding bonds may be applied to the payment of the interest thereon or the principal thereof, or to both interest and principal, or may be deposited in a reserve therefor, or may be used to refund bonds by deposit in escrow, trust or otherwise, or may be used to defray any incidental costs appertaining to the refunding, or any combination thereof, as the board may determine.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 39; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.88; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-440; Laws 2005, ch. 143, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (b), deleted “except the general fund” following “revenues of the board.”

§ 21-17-441.
Refunding and refunding bonds; funds in escrow and trust.

Any escrow or trust shall not necessarily be limited to proceeds of refunding bonds but may include other monies available for its purpose.

Any proceeds in escrow or trust, pending such use, may be invested or reinvested in investments under W.S.

21-17-426

.

Subject to any limitations appertaining thereto in section 7, article 15, Wyoming Constitution, any trust bank accounting for investments under W.S.

21-17-426

in escrow or trust may place them for safekeeping wholly or in part in any trust bank or trust banks.

Subject to any limitations appertaining thereto in section 7, article 15, Wyoming Constitution, any trust bank shall continuously secure any monies placed in escrow or trust and not so invested or reinvested in investments under W.S.

21-17-426

by a pledge in any trust bank or trust banks of federal securities in an amount at all times at least equal to the total uninvested amount of the monies accounted for in escrow or trust.

Proceeds and investments in escrow or trust, together with any interest or other gain to be derived from any investment, shall be in an amount at all times at least sufficient to pay principal, interest, any prior redemption premiums due, and any charges of the escrow agent or trustee and any other incidental expenses payable therefrom, except to the extent other provisions were made, as the obligations become due at their respective maturities or due at designated prior redemption date or dates in connection with which the board shall have exercised or shall be obligated to exercise a prior redemption option.

The computations made in determining the sufficiency shall be verified by a certified public accountant certificated to practice in this state or in any other state.

Any purchaser of any refunding bond issued under this act shall in no manner be responsible for the application of the proceeds thereof by the board or the university or any of their respective officers, agents, or employees.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 40; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.89; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-441; Laws 2005, ch. 1, § 1; ch. 143, § 1.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, in (f), substituted “certificated” for “licensed.”

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 143, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, substituted “investments under W.S.

21-17-426

” for “federal securities,” in (b), (c), and (d).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-17-404(a)(xxviii).

§ 21-17-442.
Refunding and refunding bonds; payment from pledged revenues.

Refunding bonds may be made payable from any pledged revenues which might be legally pledged for the payment of bonds being refunded at the time of the refunding or at the time of the issuance of the bonds being refunded, as the board may determine, notwithstanding the revenue sources or the pledge of the revenues for the payment of the outstanding bonds being refunded is hereby modified.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 41; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.90; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-442.

§ 21-17-443.
Refunding and refunding bonds; issuance of refunding or other bonds.

Bonds for refunding and bonds for any other purpose or purposes authorized by any other law may be issued separately or issued in combination in one (1) or more series by the board.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 42; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.91; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-443.

§ 21-17-444.
Refunding and refunding bonds; general provisions as to bonds applicable.

Except as provided in W.S.

21-17-437

through

21-17-443

, the relevant provisions elsewhere in this act appertaining generally to the issuance of bonds to defray the cost of any project shall be equally applicable in the authorization and issuance of refunding bonds, including their terms and security, the covenants and other provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, or other instrument or proceedings appertaining thereto, and other aspects of the bonds.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 43; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.92; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-444.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-17-404(a)(xxviii).

§ 21-17-445.
Determination of board final; exceptions.

The determination of the board that the limitations imposed upon the issuance of refunding bonds or upon the issuance of other securities under this act have been met is conclusive in the absence of fraud or arbitrary and gross abuse of discretion regardless of whether the authorizing resolution or the securities thereby authorized contain a recital as authorized by W.S.

21-17-416

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 44; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.93; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-445.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-17-404(a)(xxviii).

§ 21-17-446.
Securities exempt from state taxation.

Bonds and other securities issued under this act, their transfer, and the income therefrom, shall forever be and remain free and exempt from taxation by this state or any subdivision thereof.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 45; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.94; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-446.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-17-404(a)(xxviii).

§ 21-17-447.
Investment of state funds in securities authorized by W.S. 21-17-402 through 21-17-450.

The state treasurer, with the approval of the governor and the attorney general of the state, on its behalf and in its name, may invest any permanent state funds or other state funds available for investment in any of the bonds or other securities authorized to be issued pursuant to this act.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 46; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.95; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-447.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to at the end of this section, see § 21-17-404(a)(xxviii).

§ 21-17-448.
Securities authorized are legal investments for financial institutions.

Any bank, trust company, banker, savings bank, or institution, any building and loan association, savings and loan association, investment company and any other person carrying on a banking or investment business, any insurance company, insurance association, or any other person carrying on an insurance business, and any executor, administrator, curator, trustee or any other fiduciary, may invest funds or monies in their custody in any of the bonds or other securities issued under this act.

Nothing contained in this section with regard to legal investments relieves any representative of any corporation or other person of any duty of exercising reasonable care in selecting securities.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 47; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.96; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-448.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to at the end of section (a), see § 21-17-404(a)(xxviii).